dev/ortho/cyr-ara.twol
Alphabet 

 !ء
 !ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ 
 
 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ

 А:ا
 Б:ب
 В:ۋ
 Г:گ Г:ع
 Д:د
 Е:ە
 Ж:ج
 З:ز
 И:ى И:ئ
 Й:ي
 К:ك К:ق
 Л:ل
 М:م
 Н:ن
 Ң:ڴ
 О:و
 Ө:ۅ
 П:پ
 Р:ر
 С:س
 Т:ت
 У:ۇ
 Ү:ۉ
 Ф:ف
 Х:ح  ! خ
 Ч:چ
 Ш:ش
 Щ:ش
 Ь:0
 Ы:ى
 Ъ:0
 Э:ە

 а:ا
 б:ب
 в:ۋ
 г:گ г:ع
 д:د
 е:ە
 ж:ج
 з:ز
 и:ى и:ئ
 й:ي
 к:ك к:ق
 л:ل
 м:م
 н:ن
 ң:ڭ
 о:و
 ө:ۅ
 п:پ
 р:ر
 с:س
 т:ت
 у:ۇ
 ү:ۉ
 ф:ف
 х:ح ! sometimes also خ ?
 ч:چ
 ш:ش
 щ:ش
 ь:0
 ы:ى
 ъ:0
 э:ە
! % :% ء
! % :◌
! ء:ٴ
! ء:0
 ٴ:0
! %,:%،
! ,:،
! %;:%؛

 %{й%}:0
 %{й%}:ي
 
 ;


Sets 

Vow = а е ;

letter = ء ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۅ ۉ ۋ ى ي ;

backVow = а о ы у
          А О Ы У ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

frontLetter = ك گ ە ۅ ۉ ;

backLetter = ق ع ا و ۇ ;

Rules 


!"ө+dayekshe"
!ө:ٶ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;
!
!"ү+dayekshe"
!ү:ٷ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;
!
!"ә+dayekshe"
!ә:ٵ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;
!
!"і+dayekshe"
!і:ٸ <=> ء:0 _ \:frontLetter* %  ;

"и as ئ at beginning of word in environments where there's nothing indicating frontness"
!и:ئ <=> .#. Cons:* _ \[ :frontLetter ]* ;
!и:ى <=> .#. Cons:* _ :* :frontLetter :* ;
!и:ى <= .#. Cons:* _ :* :frontLetter :* ;
и:ئ /<= .#. Cons:* _ :* :frontLetter :* ;


"%{й%}:ي after vowels except е"
%{й%}:ي <=> [ Vow: - [ э: | е: ] ] _ ;

"к and г in the context of back vowels"
Cx:Cy <=> backVow: _ ;
          _ backVow: ;
      except
          .#. а: _ (%{й%}:) е: ;  ! аке:اكە
          .#. б: (%{й%}:) е: _ ;  ! Бегайым:بەگايىم
          ! keep in mind if modifying this rule:
          ! - байке:بايكە
          ! - багелек:باعەلەك
      where Cx in ( к г )
            Cy in ( ق ع )
      matched ;
